ko: 전환 키트 설치 복잡성: 고급(상당한 가공 필요); 볼트온 / 최소 가공; 중급(일부 가공/배선 필요); 전문가 설치 권장; 기타
zh-CN: 改装套件安装复杂度: 高级（大量改装）; 螺栓固定/极少改装; 中等（部分改装/接线）; 建议由专业人员安装; 其他
sv: Installationskomplexitet för växlingskit: Avancerad (omfattande tillverkning/anpassning); Bolt-on/minimal anpassning; Måttlig (viss anpassning/kabeldragning); Professionell installation rekommenderas; Annan
da: Monteringssværhedsgraden for ombygningssættet: Avanceret (betydelig tilpasning); Bolt-on / minimal tilpasning; Moderat (en del tilpasning/ledningsføring); Professionel montering anbefales; Anden
pl: Złożoność montażu zestawu konwersyjnego: Zaawansowany (znaczne modyfikacje); Przykręcany / minimalne modyfikacje; Umiarkowany (niektóre modyfikacje/okablowanie); Zalecany profesjonalny montaż; Inny
nb: Installasjonskompleksitet for konvertering/veksling: Avansert (betydelig tilpasning); Skrus på / minimal tilpasning; Moderat (noe tilpasning/kabling); Profesjonell montering anbefales; Annet
zh-TW: 改裝套件安裝複雜度: 進階 (大量加工); 螺栓固定 / 極少加工; 中等 (部分加工/配線); 建議由專業人員安裝; 其他
vi: Độ phức tạp khi lắp đặt bộ chuyển đổi: Nâng cao (chế tạo nhiều); Bắt vít / chế tạo tối thiểu; Vừa phải (một số chế tạo/đấu dây); Khuyên dùng lắp đặt chuyên nghiệp; Khác
ja: コンバージョンキットの設置の複雑さ: 上級 (大幅な加工が必要); ボルトオン / 最小限の加工; 中級 (一部の加工 / 配線が必要); 専門業者による設置を推奨; その他
fr: Complexité d’installation du kit de conversion: Avancée (fabrication importante); À boulonner / fabrication minimale; Modérée (un peu de fabrication/câblage); Installation professionnelle recommandée; Autre
ro-RO: Complexitatea instalării kitului de conversie: Avansată (modificări semnificative); Montare directă (bolt-on) / modificări minime; Moderată (unele modificări/cablaje); Se recomandă instalare profesională; Altele
en: Conversion kit installation complexity: Advanced (significant fabrication); Bolt-on / minimal fabrication; Moderate (some fabrication/wiring); Professional installation recommended; Other
bg-BG: Посочва сложността на монтажа на комплекта за конверсия: За напреднали (значителна изработка); С болтове / минимална изработка; Умерена (известна изработка/окабеляване); Препоръчва се професионален монтаж; Друга
hu: Átalakító készlet – szerelés összetettsége: Haladó (jelentős átalakítással); Felcsavarozható / minimális átalakítással; Közepes (némi átalakítással/vezetékezéssel); Szakszerű telepítés javasolt; Egyéb
th: ระดับความซับซ้อนในการติดตั้งชุดแปลง: ขั้นสูง (ต้องประกอบขึ้นรูปเป็นส่วนใหญ่); แบบยึดน็อต/ต้องประกอบขึ้นรูปเล็กน้อย; ปานกลาง (ต้องประกอบขึ้นรูป/เดินสายไฟบ้าง); แนะนำให้ติดตั้งโดยผู้เชี่ยวชาญ; อื่นๆ
ru: Сложность установки комплекта переоборудования: Продвинутый уровень (требуется существенная доработка); Установка на болты / минимальная доработка; Средний уровень (требуется некоторая доработка / подключение проводки); Рекомендуется профессиональная установка; Другое
sk-SK: Zložitosť inštalácie súpravy na konverziu: Pokročilá (vyžaduje sa výrazná úprava); Montáž skrutkovaním / minimálna úprava; Stredná (vyžaduje sa určitá úprava/zapojenie); Odporúča sa profesionálna inštalácia; Iné
es: Complejidad de la instalación del kit de conversión: Avanzada (fabricación significativa); Atornillable/fabricación mínima; Moderada (algo de fabricación/cableado); Se recomienda instalación profesional; Otra
pt-BR: Complexidade de instalação do kit de conversão: Avançada (fabricação significativa); Aparafusado/fabricação mínima; Moderada (alguma fabricação/fiação); Instalação profissional recomendada; Outro
nl: Installatiecomplexiteit ombouwset: Gevorderd (aanzienlijke fabricage); Bolt-on / minimale fabricage; Gemiddeld (enige fabricage/bedrading); Professionele installatie aanbevolen; Overig
lt-LT: Konversijos rinkinio montavimo sudėtingumas: Sudėtingas (reikia daug gamybos / modifikacijų); Prisukamas varžtais / minimalios modifikacijos; Vidutinis (šiek tiek modifikacijų / laidų); Rekomenduojamas profesionalus montavimas; Kita
pt-PT: Complexidade de instalação do kit de conversão: Avançada (fabrico significativo); Aparafusamento/fabrico mínimo; Moderada (algum fabrico/cablagem); Instalação profissional recomendada; Outra
it: complessità di installazione del kit di conversione: Avanzata (necessaria fabbricazione significativa); Imbullonato/fabbricazione minima; Moderata (necessaria un po’ di fabbricazione/cablaggio); Installazione professionale consigliata; Altro
sl-SI: Zahtevnost namestitve kompleta za predelavo: Napredno (precejšnja predelava); Pritrditev z vijaki/minimalna predelava; Zmerno (nekaj predelave/napeljave); Priporočena strokovna namestitev; Drugo
hr-HR: Složenost ugradnje kompleta za konverziju: Napredno (značajna izrada/prilagodba); Montaža vijcima / minimalna prilagodba; Umjereno (djelomična prilagodba/ožičenje); Preporučuje se profesionalna instalacija; Ostalo
cs: Náročnost instalace konverzní sady: Pokročilá (značné úpravy); Šroubovací / minimální úpravy; Střední (částečné úpravy / zapojení kabeláže); Doporučena odborná instalace; Jiné
el: Πολυπλοκότητα εγκατάστασης κιτ μετατροπής: Για προχωρημένους (σημαντικές μετατροπές/κατασκευή); Εφαρμογή με βίδες / ελάχιστες μετατροπές; Μέτρια δυσκολία (μερικές μετατροπές/καλωδιώσεις); Συνιστάται επαγγελματική εγκατάσταση; Άλλο
de: Installationskomplexität des Umrüstkits: Fortgeschritten (erhebliche Anpassungsarbeiten); Zum Anschrauben / minimale Anpassungsarbeiten; Mittel (einige Anpassungsarbeiten/Verkabelung); Professionelle Installation empfohlen; Sonstige
tr: Dönüşüm kiti kurulum karmaşıklığı: İleri seviye (kapsamlı fabrikasyon); Vidalı / minimum fabrikasyon; Orta seviye (kısmi fabrikasyon/kablolama); Profesyonel kurulum önerilir; Diğer
fi: Muunnossarjan asennuksen monimutkaisuus: Vaativa (merkittäviä muutostöitä); Pultattava / minimaalisia muutostöitä; Keskivaikea (jonkin verran muutostöitä/johdotusta); Ammattiasennusta suositellaan; Muu